District of Columbia statutes.
44-1004.04

Court costs and attorney’s fees.

The court shall award costs and a reasonable attorney’s fee to any plaintiff who prevails in an action brought under this chapter.

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 404, 33 DCR 1510
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-218, § 602(e), 36 DCR 534
1981 Ed., § 32-1454.